North Carolina, session 2025, HB228.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the City of Asheville
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year for the purpose of conducting or facilitating a study on the feasibility and cost of extending
the City's water system several miles to serve the new Pisgah View State Park.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H228-v-1*